Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202481-828.07
Rules and regulations.

The State Fire Marshal may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Wildland Fire Response Act.

Laws 2024, LB1300, § 26.
July 19, 2024